Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 3. Investment and Deposit of State Funds.

Sec. 37.10.065.
Investment of the Alaska Permanent Fund. [Repealed, § 10 ch 18 SLA 1980.
For current law see AS 37.13.]

Sec. 37.10.070.
Investment of residual money.

The commissioner shall invest, as set out in AS

37.10.071

, the money in the state treasury above an amount sufficient to meet immediate expenditure needs. In managing the invested assets, the commissioner shall

consider the status of the assets and liabilities on both a current and a probable future basis;

determine the appropriate investment objectives;

establish investment policies to achieve the objectives; and

act only in regard to the best financial interests of the state.

The commissioner may invest on the basis of probable total rate of return without regard to the distinction between principal and income and without regard to the generation of income.

In this section, “commissioner” means the commissioner of revenue.

History.

(§ 7-1-11 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 140 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 206 SLA 1970; am §§ 1, 2 ch 94 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 122 SLA 1980; am § 19 ch 141 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For duties of Legislative Budget and Audit Committee relating to state investment policy, see AS

24.20.206

.

Sec. 37.10.071.
Investment powers and duties.

In making investments under this section, the fiduciary of a state fund shall

act as official custodian of cash and investments by securing adequate and safe custodial facilities for them;

receive all items of cash and investments;

collect and deposit the principal of and income from owned or acquired investments;

invest and reinvest the assets in accordance with this section;

receive and spend appropriations to cover the cost of the exercise of duties under this section;

exercise the powers of an owner with respect to the assets;

perform all acts, not prohibited by this section, whether or not expressly authorized, that the fiduciary considers necessary or proper in administering the assets;

maintain accounting records in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;

engage an independent certified public accountant to conduct an annual audit of the financial condition and investment transactions;

enter into and enforce contracts or agreements considered necessary, convenient, or desirable for the investment purposes of this section; and

when choosing to acquire or dispose of investments, secure competitive national or international market rates or prices, or the equivalence of those rates or prices in the judgment of the fiduciary.

Under this section, the fiduciary of a state fund or the fiduciary’s designee may

delegate investment, custodial, or depository authority on a discretionary or nondiscretionary basis to officers or employees of the state or to independent firms, banks, financial institutions, or trust companies by designation through appointments, contracts, or letters of authority;

acquire or dispose of investments either directly, indirectly, or through investment pools or trusts, by competitive or negotiated agreements, contracts, or auctions, in public or private markets;

concentrate or diversify investments as the fiduciary considers appropriate to increase the probable total rate of return or to decrease the overall exposure to potentially adverse market value risks;

protect the market value or the rate of return of the investments by entering into forward agreements to buy or sell assets at a future date as a hedge against existing held assets or as a precommitment of future cash flows;

lend assets, under an agreement and for a fee, against deposited collateral of equivalent market value;

borrow assets on a short-term basis, under an agreement and for a fee, against the deposit of collateral consisting of other assets in order to accommodate temporary cash or investment needs;

hold investments in bearer or registered form in the name of the state, a fund, or nominees authorized by the fiduciary;

utilize consultants, advisors, custodians, investment services, and legal counsel for assistance in investment matters on either a continuing or a limited-term basis and with or without compensation;

declare records to be confidential and exempt from AS

40.25.110

and

40.25.120

if the records contain information that discloses the particulars of the business or the affairs of a private enterprise, investor, borrower, advisor, consultant, counsel, or manager.

In exercising investment, custodial, or depository powers or duties under this section, the fiduciary of a state fund shall apply the prudent investor rule and exercise the fiduciary duty in the sole financial best interest of the fund entrusted to the fiduciary. Among beneficiaries of a fund, the fiduciaries shall treat beneficiaries with impartiality.

In exercising investment, custodial, or depository powers or duties under this section, the fiduciary or the fiduciary’s designee is liable for a breach of a duty that is assigned or delegated under this section, or under AS

14.40.255

,

14.40.280(c)

,

14.40.400(b)

, AS

37.10.070

, AS

37.14.160

, or

37.14.170

. However, the fiduciary or the designee is not liable for a breach of a duty that has been delegated to another person if the delegation is prudent under the applicable standard of prudence set out in statute or if the duty is assigned by law to another person, except to the extent that the fiduciary or designee

knowingly participates in, or knowingly undertakes to conceal, an act or omission of another person knowing that the act or omission is a breach of that person’s duties under this chapter;

by failure to comply with this section in the administration of specific responsibilities, enables another person to commit a breach of duty; or

has knowledge of a breach of duty by another person, unless the fiduciary or designee makes reasonable efforts under the circumstances to remedy the breach.

The state shall defend and indemnify the fiduciary or an officer or employee of the state against liability under (d) of this section to the extent that the alleged act or omission was performed in good faith and was prudent under the applicable standard of prudence.

In this section, “fiduciary of a state fund” or “fiduciary” means

the commissioner of revenue for investments under AS

37.10.070

;

with respect to the Alaska Retirement Management Board, for investments of the collective funds that it manages and administers,

each trustee who serves on the board of trustees; and

any other person who exercises control or authority with respect to management or disposition of assets for which the board is responsible or who gives investment advice to the board; or

the person or body provided by law to manage the investments for investments not subject to AS

37.10.070

.

History.

(§ 20 ch 141 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 13 ch 9 SLA 1997; am § 33 ch 32 SLA 1997; am §§ 56, 57 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 3 ch 80 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

and

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 and 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 and 09.25.120.

Administrative Code. —

For procurement, see 15 AAC 112, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 8, 2018, in (d), in the list of statutory citations, substituted “AS

37.14.160

” for “AS

37.14.110(c)

,

37.14.160

”.

Sec. 37.10.075.
Deposit of state funds.

When the commissioner of revenue determines that there are funds in the state treasury that are not being used for the purposes provided for in AS

37.10.070

, they may be deposited in financial institutions. Collateral may be required by the commissioner to secure state deposits provided for under this section.

The commissioner of revenue may require the banks in which state funds are deposited under a time deposit agreement to pay at least a minimum interest rate to be fixed by the Department of Revenue, and this interest when paid shall be deposited in the general fund or in the other funds that are established by law.

This section does not prohibit the Department of Revenue from depositing the funds that it considers necessary for the proper conduct of the office in solvent banks outside the state under the terms and conditions provided in this section.

The Department of Revenue may deposit funds in banks inside or outside the state without requiring those banks in which the funds are deposited to pay interest on the deposits. It is the intention of the legislature that the department may compensate the banks for handling state disbursements in a manner determined by the commissioner of revenue to be in the best interests of the state.

Banks holding state deposits shall, as a condition of retaining those deposits, submit all information concerning the deposits and other relevant matters that may be requested by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 206 SLA 1970; am §§ 1, 2 ch 149 SLA 1978; am § 17 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Sec. 37.10.078.
Prohibited deposits and investments in certain banks.

The commissioner of revenue may not make investments or deposits with a bank doing business in Alaska that has a general practice of

charging a fee for handling disbursements issued by the state; or

refusing to handle disbursements issued by the state.

History.

(§ 11 ch 122 SLA 1980; am § 18 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Legislative history reports. —

For the adoption of the Free Conference Committee letter of intent on SB 315, see 1980 House Journal pages 1964, 2018.

Secs. 37.10.079,
37.10.080.
Purchase and sale of bonds. [Repealed, § 33 ch 141 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 37.10.085.
Financial aid to corporations by state or political subdivision.

Except as provided in AS

14.40.458

, (c) or (d) of this section, or AS

37.10.089

, neither the state nor a political subdivision of the state may

make a subscription to the capital stock of a corporation;

lend its credit for the use of a corporation; or

borrow money for the use of a corporation.

This section does not apply to debt issued by a municipality or a municipal joint insurance arrangement under AS

21.76.120

.

To the extent that the political subdivision is authorized to acquire, own, or operate a public utility, it may exercise that power by acquiring and owning, in a manner consistent with law, all of the capital stock of a corporation that owns or operates a public utility. The political subdivision’s authority with respect to lending its credit and borrowing money for the use of the corporation is the same as if the political subdivision had acquired the assets of the corporation.

This section does not apply to investments of the assets of the public employees’ retirement system established under AS 39.35 or the teachers’ retirement system established under AS 14.25, to the extent the investments are made in the stocks, bonds, and other securities of

a corporation licensed under AS 10.13; or

a corporation attempting to become licensed under AS 10.13 if the corporation intends to use the proceeds to fulfill the tasks necessary to become licensed under AS 10.13.

History.

(§§ 4-2-1, 12-1-3 ACLA 1949; am § 5 ch 85 SLA 1989; am §§ 1, 2 ch 140 SLA 1990; am §§ 9, 10 ch 133 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 2 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 18 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 2009; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 13, 2018, in (d), deleted “(1) the financial assistance program established under AS

37.17.500

– 37.17.690; or (2)” following “This section does not apply to”, and made stylistic changes.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 26, SLA 2018 (HB 340), which amended (d) of this section, see 2018 House Journal 2378.

Sec. 37.10.087.
Loans to bond construction funds.

When a construction fund or account established to receive the proceeds of state general obligation bonds is temporarily exhausted, the commissioner of administration on recommendation of the state bond committee may temporarily transfer money from the general fund to the bond construction fund or account.

If the amount of the transfer exceeds 25 percent of the amount authorized for the general obligation bonds, the commissioner of administration shall obtain approval of the transfer from the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee before the transfer.

If a temporary transfer has already been made from the general fund to the bond construction fund or account, additional transfers may be made, but the total amount of the outstanding transfers not returned to the general fund under (d) of this section may not exceed 25 percent of the amount authorized for the general obligation bonds without approval from the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

Transfers under (a) of this section may be made only when the commissioner of revenue determines and certifies to the state bond committee that there is in the general fund an amount sufficient to meet current cash expenditure needs of the state.

The amount transferred to a construction fund or account under (a) of this section may not exceed anticipated receipts from the unsold general obligation bonds to be issued and the federal programs receipts estimated to be received for the general obligation bond construction program financed from the construction fund or account.

Money transferred from the general fund under (a) of this section shall be returned to the general fund within 15 months after the transfer.

The commissioner of administration shall notify the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee in writing of a transfer of money from the general fund under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 126 SLA 1972; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 90 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.10.088.
Department of Administration authorized to make advances to the University.

During any fiscal year the Department of Administration may make advances to the University of Alaska against verified receivables from appropriations for grants and contracts from federal or private sources of the university and upon condition that the university reimburse the fund for these advances from funds received by the university from federal or private sources. The advances may not exceed 80 percent of the verified receivables from grants and contracts appropriated from federal or private sources.

The total of advances in a fiscal year may not exceed 10 percent of the total of grants and contracts from federal and private sources appropriated to the university for that fiscal year. The amounts advanced in a fiscal year shall be repaid in full to the department within 120 days following the close of that fiscal year. If the repayment is not made on a timely basis, the department may withhold amounts due from state fund appropriations for the university.

The commissioner of administration shall submit a quarterly report of all advances and reimbursements under this section to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

The department shall establish the procedure for making advances to the university and for securing reimbursement from the university.

History.

(§ 8 ch 46 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1978; am § 63 ch 14 SLA 1987)

Legislative history reports. —

For letter of intent on ch. 46, SLA 1977 (HCSSB 261), see 1977 House Journal, p. 1019.

Sec. 37.10.089.
Loans to the education loan fund; bond purchase agreements and letters of credit.

If the education loan fund (AS

14.42.210

) is unable to fully finance loan demand in a fiscal year, the commissioner may invest in the education loan fund for the purpose of financing education loans under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.175

,

14.43.600

—

14.43.750

, and AS

14.44.040

. The commissioner shall require the corporation to secure the investment of state money.

The commissioner may make investments under (a) of this section only when the commissioner determines that market conditions relating to tax-exempt private activity revenue bonds make the issuance of the bonds by the corporation impracticable or uneconomical for the purpose of financing education loans under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.175

,

14.43.600

—

14.43.750

, and AS

14.44.040

.

The corporation shall repay money invested under (a) of this section under terms established by the commissioner and agreed to by the corporation. Except as provided in this section, the terms must be consistent with the duties of a fiduciary set out in AS

37.10.071(c)

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commissioner is authorized to enter into an agreement with the corporation to provide a bond purchase agreement and a letter of credit when market conditions relating to those credit enhancement mechanisms are uneconomical. The commissioner may require the corporation to pay the costs associated with providing credit enhancement and may charge the corporation a fee for this service.

The commissioner may charge the corporation interest on the investments under (a) of this section. The rate of interest may not exceed the five-year average return on the state’s general fund.

The commissioner may charge the corporation an annual fee for the services provided under (d) of this section. The annual fee may not exceed 0.15 percent of the average principal outstanding and interest covered by the bond purchase agreement and the letter of credit.

If a draw on the bond purchase agreement and the letter of credit occurs under this section, the commissioner may charge the corporation an additional annual rate of interest not to exceed three percent on the bonds held under the bond purchase agreement and letter of credit.

The term of the investment under (a) of this section may not exceed four years and the commitment under (d) of this section may not exceed four years from the commencement of the initial investment, bond purchase agreement, and letter of credit.

The maximum amount of the investment under (a) of this section may not exceed $100,000,000. The maximum amount of the commitment under (d) of this section may not exceed $106,000,000.

The commissioner may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this section.

In this section,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of revenue;

“corporation” means the Alaska Student Loan Corporation created under AS

14.42.100

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 48 SLA 2009)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 48, SLA 2009 (HB 172), adding this section, see 2009 House Journal 410 — 411.